Massachusetts, session 194th, H1788.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby 
amended by inserting after section 24X, the following section:-  
Section 24Y. (a) Any vehicle operated by a person arrested for a violation of 
subparagraph (1) of paragraph (a) of section 24 or section 24L shall be removed and impounded 
as provided by the provisions of this section, section 69L of chapter 111 and section 2C of 
chapter 85 and any rule or regulation adopted thereunder, for a period not less than 12 hours 
from the time of such arrest.  
(b) Whenever a person is summoned by or on behalf of a person who has been arrested 
for a violation of subparagraph (1) of paragraph (a) of section 24 or section 24L, in order to 

of 2 10 transport or accompany the arrestee from the premises of a law enforcement agency, the law 
enforcement agency shall provide that person with a written statement advising that person of the 
potential criminal and civil liability for permitting or facilitating the arrestee’s operation of a 
motor vehicle while the arrestee remains under the influence or impaired by alcohol, drugs, drugs 
and alcohol, a controlled dangerous substance, or any combination thereof.  
(1) The person to whom the statement is issued shall acknowledge, in writing, receipt of 
the statement, or the law enforcement agency shall record the fact that the written statement was 
provided, but the person refused to sign an acknowledgment.  
(2) The attorney general shall establish the content and form of the written statement and 
acknowledgment to be used by law enforcement agencies throughout the commonwealth.  
(3) Nothing in this section shall impose any obligation on a physician or other health care 
provider involved in the treatment or evaluation of the arrestee.  
(c) A motor vehicle impounded under this section may not be released unless the person 
claiming the motor vehicle:  
Presents a valid driver’s license, proof of ownership of or lawful authority to operate the 
motor vehicle, and proof of valid motor vehicle insurance for that motor vehicle, or  
Subject to review of the district court, meets any other reasonable condition for release 
that is established by the law enforcement agency.  
(d) A law enforcement agency that impounds a motor vehicle under this section may 
charge a reasonable fee for towing and storage of the motor vehicle and may retain the motor 
vehicle until the fee is paid.